Utah statutes.
78B-2-202.   Actions by patentees or grantees from state.

A person receiving letters patent or a grant of real property from the state may not bring an action based on the patent or grant unless the state would have been able to bring an action had the patent or grant not been made.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

